North Carolina statutes. Chapter 116. Higher Education.
Article 29. The North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics.

§ 116-230.1.
Policy.

It is hereby declared to be the policy of the State to foster, encourage, promote, and provide assistance in the development of skills and careers in science and mathematics among the people of the State.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 206(b); 2006-66, s. 9.11(j).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11.(j), effective July 1, 2007, inserted “and careers” following “development of skills.”

§ 116-231.
Reestablishment of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics as a Constituent High School of The University of North Carolina.

The North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics is hereby reestablished, as a constituent high school of The University of North Carolina, and shall be governed by the Board of Governors as prescribed in this Chapter and a Board of Trustees as prescribed in this Article.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 206(b); 2006-66, s. 9.11(k).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11(k), effective July 1, 2007, substituted “a Constituent High School” for “an Affiliated School” in the section catchline; and in the text of the section, substituted “a constituent high school” for “an affiliated school”, and inserted “the Board of Governors as prescribed in this Chapter
and.”

§ 116-232.
Purposes.

The purposes of the School shall be to foster the educational development of North Carolina high school students who are academically talented in the areas of science and mathematics and show promise of exceptional development and global leadership through participation in a residential educational setting emphasizing instruction in the areas of science and mathematics; and to provide instruction, methods, and curricula designed to improve teaching and learning in North Carolina and the nation with an emphasis on distance education and programs that expand pathways for students into careers in science and mathematics.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 206(b); 2006-66, s. 9.11(l).

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11(
l
), effective July 1, 2007, rewrote the section.

§ 116-233.
Board of Trustees; appointment; terms of office.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 116-31(d)

, there shall be a Board of Trustees of the School, which shall consist of up to 30 members as follows:

Thirteen members who shall be appointed by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, one from each congressional district.

Four members without regard to residency who shall be appointed by the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina.

Three members, ex officio, who shall be the chief academic officers, respectively, of constituent institutions or the members’ designees. The Board of Governors shall in 1985 and quadrennially thereafter designate the three constituent institutions whose chief academic officers or officers’ designees shall so serve, such designations to expire on June 30, 1989, and quadrennially thereafter.

The chief academic officer of a college or university in North Carolina other than a constituent institution, ex officio, or the chief academic officer’s designee. The Board of Governors shall designate in 1985 and quadrennially thereafter which college or university whose chief academic officer or officer’s designee shall so serve, such designation to expire on June 30, 1989, and quadrennially thereafter.

Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the President Pro Tempore of the Senate in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

.

Three members appointed by the General Assembly upon the recommendation of the Speaker of the House of Representatives in accordance with

G.S. 120-121

.

Repealed by Session Laws 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 36, effective December 19, 2016. See editor’s note for applicability.

The president of the student government, ex officio, who shall be a nonvoting member.

Up to two additional nonvoting members selected at the discretion of the chancellor and the Board of Trustees, with terms expiring June 30 of each year.

Appointed members of the Board of Trustees shall be selected for their interest in and commitment to public education and to the purposes of the School, and they shall be charged with the responsibility of serving the interests of the whole State. In appointing members, the objective shall be to obtain the services of the best qualified persons, taking into consideration the desirability of diversity of membership, including men and women, representatives of different races, and members of different political parties.

No member of the General Assembly or officer or employee of the State, the School, The University of North Carolina, or of any constituent institution of The University of North Carolina, shall be eligible to be appointed to the Board of Trustees except as specified under subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section. No spouse of a member of the General Assembly, or of an officer or employee of the school may be a member of the Board of Trustees. Any appointed trustee who is elected or appointed to the General Assembly or who becomes an officer or employee of the State, except as specified under subdivision (3) of subsection (a) of this section, or whose spouse is elected or appointed to the General Assembly or becomes such an officer or employee of the School, shall be deemed thereupon to resign from his or her membership on the Board of Trustees. This subsection does not apply to ex officio members.

Members appointed under subdivisions (1) or (2) of subsection (a) of this section shall serve staggered four-year terms expiring June 30 of odd numbered years.

(d1)

Only an ex officio member shall be eligible to serve more than two successive terms.

(d2)

Any vacancy in the membership of the Board of Trustees appointed under G.S. 116-233(a)(1) or (2) shall be reported promptly by the Secretary of the Board of Trustees to the Board of Governors of The University of North Carolina, which shall fill any such vacancy by appointment of a replacement member to serve for the balance of the unexpired term. Any vacancy in members appointed under G.S. 116-233(a)(5) or (6) shall be filled in accordance with

G.S. 120-122

. Reapportionment of congressional districts does not affect the right of any member to complete the term for which the member was appointed.

Of the initial members appointed under G.S. 116-233(a)(5) in 1985, one member shall serve a term to expire June 30, 1987, and one member shall serve a term to expire June 30, 1989. Subsequent appointments shall be for four-year terms. The initial members appointed under G.S. 116-233(a)(6) in 1985 shall be appointed for terms to expire June 30, 1987. Subsequent appointments shall be for two-year terms until January 15, 2017, at which point subsequent appointments shall be for four-year terms.

(e1)

The initial members appointed under G.S. 116-233(a)(5) and (6) in 2017, and successors of those members, shall serve four-year terms.

Whenever an appointed member of the Board of Trustees shall fail, for any reason other than ill health or service in the interest of the State or nation, to be present at three successive regular meetings of the Board, his or her place as a member of the Board shall be deemed vacant. The office of any member of the Board who serves ex officio under subdivisions (3) and (4) of subsection (a) of this section shall not be declared vacant if the member or the member’s designee has complied with the attendance requirements of this subsection.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 206(b); 1991 (Reg. Sess., 1992), c. 879, ss. 1, 2; 1995, c. 490, s. 45; c. 509, s. 65; 2003-57, ss. 1, 2; 2006-66, s. 9.11(m); 2007-278, s. 4; 2015-30, s. 1; 2016-126, 4th Ex. Sess., s. 36; 2021-90, s. 18(a), (b).

§ 116-234.
Board of Trustees; meetings; rules of procedure; officers.

The Board of Trustees shall meet at least three times a year and may hold special meetings at any time, at the call of the chairman or upon petition addressed to the chairman by at least four of the members of the Board.

Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 116-32

, the Board of Trustees shall elect a chairman and a vice-chairman; no ex officio member may hold such an office.

The Board of Trustees shall determine its own rules of procedure and may delegate to such committees as it may create such of its powers as it deems appropriate.

Members of the Board of Trustees, other than ex officio members under G.S. 116-233(a)(3) and G.S. 116-233(a)(8), shall receive such per diem compensation and necessary travel and subsistence expenses while engaged in the discharge of their official duties as is provided by law for members of State boards and commissions. Ex officio members under G.S. 116-233(a)(3) and G.S. 116-233(a)(8) shall be reimbursed for travel expenses as provided by

G.S. 138-6

.

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 206(b); 1995, c. 509, s. 66; 2006-66, s. 9.11(n); 2015-30, s. 2.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11(n), effective July 1, 2007, substituted “three
times a year” for “four
times a year” in subsection (a); and substituted “Notwithstanding the provisions of

G.S. 116-32

, the” for “The” at the beginning of subsection (b).

Session Laws 2015-30, s. 2, effective July 1, 2015, substituted “116-233(a)(3) and G.S. 116-233(a)(8)” for “116-233(a)(3)” twice in subsection (d).

§ 116-235.
Board of Trustees; additional powers and duties. [Effective until July 1, 2022]

In addition to the powers enumerated in Chapter 116, Article I, Part 3, the Board of Trustees shall have the powers and duties set out in this section.

(a1)

Academic Program. —

The Board of Trustees shall establish the standard course of study for the School. This course of study shall set forth the subjects to be taught in each grade and the texts and other educational materials on each subject to be used in each grade.

The Board of Trustees shall adopt regulations governing class size, the instructional calendar, the length of the instructional day, and the number of instructional days in each term.

Students. —

Admission of Students. — The School shall admit students in accordance with criteria, standards, and procedures established by the Board of Trustees. To be eligible to be considered for admission, an applicant must be either a legal resident of the State, as defined by G.S. 116-143.1(a)(1), or a student whose parent is an active duty member of the Armed Forces, as defined by G.S. 116-143.3(2), who is abiding in this State incident to active military duty at the time the application is submitted, provided the student shares the abode of that parent; eligibility to remain enrolled in the School shall terminate at the end of any school year during which a student becomes a nonresident of the State. The Board of Trustees shall ensure, insofar as possible without jeopardizing admission standards, that an equal number of qualified applicants is admitted to the program and to the residential summer institutes in science and mathematics from each of North Carolina’s congressional districts. In no event shall the differences in the number of qualified applicants offered admission to the program from each of North Carolina’s congressional districts be more than two and one-half percentage points from the average number per district who are offered admission.

School Attendance. — Every parent, guardian, or other person in this State having charge or control of a child who is enrolled in the School and who is less than 16 years of age shall cause such child to attend school continuously for a period equal to the time which the School shall be in session. No person shall encourage, entice, or counsel any child to be unlawfully absent from the School. Any person who aids or abets a student’s unlawful absence from the School shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Chancellor of the School shall be responsible for implementing such additional policies concerning compulsory attendance as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees, including regulations concerning lawful and unlawful absences, permissible excuses for temporary absences, maintenance of attendance records, and attendance counseling.

Student Discipline. — Rules of conduct governing students of the School shall be established by the Board of Trustees. The Chancellor, other administrative officers, and all teachers, substitute teachers, voluntary teachers, teacher aides and assistants, and student teachers in the School may use reasonable force in the exercise of lawful authority to restrain or correct pupils and maintain order.

through (h). Repealed by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11(s), effective July 1, 2007.

(i)

The Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags and the Recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance. —

The Board of Trustees shall adopt policies to require (i) the display of the United States and North Carolina flags in each classroom when available, (ii) the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) the instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. These policies shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom.

(j)

Information About Child Abuse and Neglect. —

The School shall implement the rule addressing student awareness of child abuse and neglect, including sexual abuse, adopted by the State Board of Education under G.S. 115C-12(47).

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 206(b); 1993, c. 539, ss. 896, 897; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 507, s. 15.1; 2002-126, s. 9.12(c); 2005-318, s. 2; 2005-445, s. 8.1; 2006-66, ss. 9.11(o)-9.11(s); 2006-137, s. 5; 2011-183, s. 88; 2021-132, s. 6(f).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective until July 1, 2022. For the section as amended July 1, 2022, see the following section, also numbered

G.S. 116-235

.

Pilot Program to Raise the High School Dropout Age from Sixteen to Eighteen.

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 8.21, establishes a pilot program pursuant to this section to increase the high school dropout age from 16 years of age to the completion of the school year coinciding with the calendar year in which a student reaches 18 years of age, unless the student has previously graduated from high school in the Hickory Public Schools, the Newton-Conover City Schools, and the Rutherford County Schools. For complete provisions see the note under 115C-378 under the same catchline.

§ 116-235.
Board of Trustees; additional powers and duties. [Effective July 1, 2022]

In addition to the powers enumerated in Chapter 116, Article I, Part 3, the Board of Trustees shall have the powers and duties set out in this section.

(a1)

Academic Program. —

The Board of Trustees shall establish the standard course of study for the School. This course of study shall set forth the subjects to be taught in each grade and the texts and other educational materials on each subject to be used in each grade.

The Board of Trustees shall adopt regulations governing class size, the instructional calendar, the length of the instructional day, and the number of instructional days in each term.

Students. —

Admission of Students. — The School shall admit students in accordance with criteria, standards, and procedures established by the Board of Trustees. To be eligible to be considered for admission, an applicant must be either a legal resident of the State, as defined by G.S. 116-143.1(a)(1), or a student whose parent is an active duty member of the Armed Forces, as defined by G.S. 116-143.3(2), who is abiding in this State incident to active military duty at the time the application is submitted, provided the student shares the abode of that parent; eligibility to remain enrolled in the School shall terminate at the end of any school year during which a student becomes a nonresident of the State. The Board of Trustees shall ensure, insofar as possible without jeopardizing admission standards, that an equal number of qualified applicants is admitted to the program and to the residential summer institutes in science and mathematics from each of North Carolina’s congressional districts. In no event shall the differences in the number of qualified applicants offered admission to the program from each of North Carolina’s congressional districts be more than two and one-half percentage points from the average number per district who are offered admission.

School Attendance. — Every parent, guardian, or other person in this State having charge or control of a child who is enrolled in the School and who is less than 16 years of age shall cause such child to attend school continuously for a period equal to the time which the School shall be in session. No person shall encourage, entice, or counsel any child to be unlawfully absent from the School. Any person who aids or abets a student’s unlawful absence from the School shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The Chancellor of the School shall be responsible for implementing such additional policies concerning compulsory attendance as shall be adopted by the Board of Trustees, including regulations concerning lawful and unlawful absences, permissible excuses for temporary absences, maintenance of attendance records, and attendance counseling.

Student Discipline. — Rules of conduct governing students of the School shall be established by the Board of Trustees. The Chancellor, other administrative officers, and all teachers, substitute teachers, voluntary teachers, teacher aides and assistants, and student teachers in the School may use reasonable force in the exercise of lawful authority to restrain or correct pupils and maintain order.

Interscholastic Athletics. — If the Board of Trustees elects to provide a program of interscholastic athletics, that program shall be conducted in accordance with rules adopted by the State Board of Education, in accordance with Article 29E of Chapter 115C of the General Statutes.

through (h). Repealed by Session Laws 2006-66, s. 9.11(s), effective July 1, 2007.

(i)

The Display of the United States and North Carolina Flags and the Recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance. —

The Board of Trustees shall adopt policies to require (i) the display of the United States and North Carolina flags in each classroom when available, (ii) the recitation of the Pledge of Allegiance on a daily basis, and (iii) the instruction on the meaning and historical origins of the flag and the Pledge of Allegiance. These policies shall not compel any person to stand, salute the flag, or recite the Pledge of Allegiance. If flags are donated or are otherwise available, flags shall be displayed in each classroom.

(j)

Information About Child Abuse and Neglect. —

The School shall implement the rule addressing student awareness of child abuse and neglect, including sexual abuse, adopted by the State Board of Education under G.S. 115C-12(47).

History.

1985, c. 757, s. 206(b); 1993, c. 539, ss. 896, 897; 1994, Ex. Sess., c. 24, s. 14(c); 1995, c. 507, s. 15.1; 2002-126, s. 9.12(c); 2005-318, s. 2; 2005-445, s. 8.1; 2006-66, ss. 9.11(o)-9.11(s); 2006-137, s. 5; 2011-183, s. 88; 2021-132, s. 6(f); 2021-184, s. 2(d).

Section Set Out Twice.

The section above is effective July 1, 2022. For the section as in effect until July 1, 2022, see the preceding section, also numbered

G.S. 116-235

.

Pilot Program to Raise the High School Dropout Age from Sixteen to Eighteen.

Session Laws
2016-94, s. 8.21, establishes a pilot program pursuant to this section to increase the high school dropout age from 16 years of age to the completion of the school year coinciding with the calendar year in which a student reaches 18 years of age, unless the student has previously graduated from high school in the Hickory Public Schools, the Newton-Conover City Schools, and the Rutherford County Schools. For complete provisions see the note under 115C-378 under the same catchline.

§§ 116-235.1 through 116-235.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.

§ 116-235.5.
Morganton campus authorized of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics.

The Board of Trustees of the North Carolina School of Science and Mathematics is hereby authorized to establish a western campus of the school to be located in Morganton, North Carolina.

History.

2020-31, s. 1.

§§ 116-236 through 116-238.
[Repealed]

Repealed, by Session Laws 2006-66, ss. 9.11(t) through 9.11(v), effective July 1, 2007.

§ 116-238.1.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2009-451, s. 9.6(b), effective July 1, 2014.

History.

2003-284, s. 9.4(a); 2004-203, s. 47; 2005-276, s. 9.14(a); 2009-451, s. 9.6(a), (b); repealed by 2009-451, s. 9.6(b), effective July 1, 2014.

§ 116-238.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 2007-484, s. 30, effective August 30, 2007.

§§ 116-239 through 116-239.4.

Reserved for future codification purposes.